Hawaii, session 2026, SB2455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's policy of providing highly subsidized parking for state employees limits the employees' choices, does not reduce traffic congestion or greenhouse gas emissions, and contradicts state policies that encourage alternative modes of transportation.  According to the department of accounting and general services, 3,968 parking stalls managed by that department are made available to state employees on Oahu, in addition to three hundred forty-seven on Hawaii, two hundred ninety-six on Maui, and two hundred sixty-six on Kauai. The legislature further finds that for many years the State has offered the limited option to employees to pay for monthly parking privileges in lots managed by the department of accounting and general services located at or near the employee's workplace through pre-tax payroll deductions.  In addition to the savings for purchasing parking pre-tax, the parking privileges are offered at a rate of approximately one‑fourth of the public rate.  For example, employee parking rates in the Honolulu downtown area range from $30 to $70 per month before any pre-tax savings, which is a fraction of the cost to park in nearby private lots. Comparatively, the cost of a monthly adult bus pass on Oahu is $80, and the State does not provide a comparable bus pass benefit to its employees nor offer to all employees the ability to purchase a bus pass on a pre-tax basis.  State employees who travel to work by bicycle, foot, wheelchair or other mobility aid, or private car sharing also do not receive any transportation benefit or support even though their commuting modes reduce the number of cars driven in the State and parked in state lots. The legislature also finds that other jurisdictions, such as Washington, D.C., have enacted equitable transportation benefits laws and policies.  Various options, such as offering an equivalent transportation benefit that employees could select to apply to the cost of their preferred mode of transportation, could be implemented to increase parity. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the director of human resources development, in consultation with the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission, state energy office, and department of accounting and general services, to: (1)  Develop a commuting choice benefit program regardless of mode of transportation for all state employees in the executive branch; and (2)  Recommend a similar program for state employees of the legislative and judiciary branches. SECTION 2. (a)  The director of human resources development, in consultation with the Hawaiʻi climate change mitigation and adaptation commission, state energy office, and department of accounting and general services, shall develop a comprehensive commuting choice benefit program regardless of mode of transportation for all state employees in the executive branch. The director shall also recommend a comprehensive commuting choice benefit program for state employees of the legislative and judiciary branches. Each program shall include walking, rolling using a wheelchair or other mobility aid, car sharing, biking, and using public transportation, and shall encourage the use of healthy, safe, economically sound, and environmentally sustainable commuting modes. (b)  The director of human resources development shall submit a report on the progress made toward developing the program to the legislature no later than forty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________